Utah statutes.
78B-15-507.   Additional genetic testing.
The tribunal shall order additional genetic testing upon the request of a
party who contests the result of the original testing.  If the previous
genetic testing identified a man as the father of the child under Section
78B-15-505, the tribunal may not order additional testing unless the party
provides advance payment for the testing.  If the tribunal orders a second
genetic test in accordance with this section, the additional testing must be
completed within 45 days of the tribunal's order or the requesting party's
objection to the first test will be automatically denied.  If failure to
complete the test occurs because of noncooperation of the mother or
unavailability of the child, the time will be tolled.
